Hawaii statutes.
§667-60 Unfair or
deceptive act or practice; transfer of title. (a) Any foreclosing mortgagee who engages
in any of the following violations of this chapter shall have
committed an unfair or deceptive act or practice under section 480-2:

(1) Failing to provide a borrower or
mortgagor with, or failing to serve as required, the
information required by section 667-22 or 667-55;

(2) Failing to publish, or to post, information on the mortgaged property, as required by section
667-27 or 667-28;

(3) Failing to take any action required by
section 667-24 if the default is cured or an agreement is reached;

(4) Engaging in conduct prohibited under section 667-56;

(5) Holding a public sale in violation of
section 667-25;

(6) Failing to include in a public notice of
public sale the information required by section 667-27 or section 667-28;

(7) Failing to provide the information
required by section 667-41;

(8) With regard to mortgage foreclosure
dispute resolution under part V:

(A) Failing to provide notice of the
availability of dispute resolution as required by section 667-75;

(B) Participating in dispute resolution
without authorization to negotiate a loan modification, or without access to a
person so authorized, as required by section 667-80(a)(1);

(C) Failing to provide required information
or documents as required by section 667-80(c); or

(D) Completing a nonjudicial foreclosure if a
neutral's closing report under section 667-82 indicates that the foreclosing
mortgagee failed to comply with requirements of the mortgage foreclosure
dispute resolution program;

(9) Completing a nonjudicial foreclosure
while a stay is in effect under section 667-83;

(10) Failing to distribute sale proceeds as
required by section 667-31;

(11) Making any false statement in the
affidavit of public sale required by section 667-32;

(12) Attempting to collect a deficiency in
violation of section 667-38; and

(13) Failing to file a foreclosure notice with the
department as required by section 667-76(a).

(b) Notwithstanding subsection (a), the
transfer of title to the purchaser of the property as a result of a foreclosure
under this chapter shall only be subject to avoidance under section 480-12 for
violations described in subsection (a)(1) to (9) if such violations are shown
to be substantial and material; provided that a foreclosure sale shall not be
subject to avoidance under section 480-12 for violation of section 667-56(5).

(c) Any action to void the transfer of title
to the purchaser of property pursuant to a foreclosure by power of sale under
part II of this chapter shall be filed in the circuit court of the circuit
within which the foreclosed property is situated no later than sixty days
following the recording of the affidavit required by section 667-32. If no such
action is filed within the sixty-day period, then title to the property shall
be deemed conclusively vested in the purchaser free and clear of any claim by
the mortgagor or anyone claiming by, through, or under the mortgagor. [L 2011, c 48, pt of §6; am L 2012, c 182,
§34]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next